Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3515
Fees.

The department shall establish and collect fees for initial licensure and renewal under the Surgical First Assistant Practice Act as provided in sections 38-151 to 38-157.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 15.